incubator/apertium-en-lt.lt.dix
    <pardef n="ka/tė__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tė</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tės</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tei</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tę</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tėje</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>tėn</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tės</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čių</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tėms</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tes</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tėmis</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tėse</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>tėsna</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tės</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ir__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="abipus__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="ir"><i>ir</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="bei"><i>bei</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="bet"><i>bet</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="o"><i>o</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="tačiau"><i>tačiau</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="kad"><i>kad</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="jog"><i>jog</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="kai"><i>kai</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="kol"><i>kol</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="jei"><i>jei</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="jeigu"><i>jeigu</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="nes"><i>nes</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="kadangi"><i>kadangi</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="kaip"><i>kaip</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="nors"><i>nors</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ar"><i>ar</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="arba"><i>arba</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="anapus"><i>anapus</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="anot"><i>anot</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ant"><i>ant</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="arti"><i>arti</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="arčiau"><i>arčiau</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="aukščiau"><i>aukščiau</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="be"><i>be</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="dėka"><i>dėka</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="dėl"><i>dėl</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="greta"><i>greta</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="iki"><i>iki</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="įkypai"><i>įkypai</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="įstrižai"><i>įstrižai</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="iš"><i>iš</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="išilgai"><i>išilgai</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="kiaurai"><i>kiaurai</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="kitapus"><i>kitapus</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="lig"><i>lig</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ligi"><i>ligi</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="link"><i>link</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="netoli"><i>netoli</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="nuo"><i>nuo</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pasak"><i>pasak</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pirma"><i>pirma</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pirmiau"><i>pirmiau</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="po"><i>po</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="prie"><i>prie</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pusiau"><i>pusiau</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="skersai"><i>skersai</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="skradžiai"><i>skradžiai</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="šalia"><i>šalia</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="šiapus"><i>šiapus</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="tarp"><i>tarp</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="už"><i>už</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="viduj"><i>viduj</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="vidury"><i>vidury</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="vietoj"><i>vietoj</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="virš"><i>virš</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="viršuj"><i>viršuj</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="viršum"><i>viršum</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="žemiau"><i>žemiau</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="apie"><i>apie</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="aplink"><i>aplink</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="į"><i>į</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="įkypai"><i>įkypai</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="įstrižai"><i>įstrižai</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="išilgai"><i>išilgai</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="kiaurai"><i>kiaurai</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pagal"><i>pagal</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="palei"><i>palei</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pas"><i>pas</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="paskui"><i>paskui</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="per"><i>per</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="po"><i>po</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="prieš"><i>prieš</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="priešais"><i>priešais</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="skradžiai"><i>skradžiai</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="už"><i>už</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="su"><i>su</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ties"><i>ties</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ankstininkė"><i>ankstinin</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="apželtakė"><i>apželta</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aulininkė"><i>aulinin</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="balandininkė"><i>balandinin</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="beldikė"><i>beldi</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="boksininkė"><i>boksinin</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cholerikė"><i>choleri</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="daugiakovininkė"><i>daugiakovinin</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="didžialaukė"><i>didžialau</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="druskė"><i>drus</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dvariškė"><i>dvariš</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eibininkė"><i>eibinin</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="esperantininkė"><i>esperantinin</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fokusininkė"><i>fokusinin</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gašiokė"><i>gašio</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grandininkė"><i>grandinin</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="importininkė"><i>importinin</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="išlaukė"><i>išlau</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="juostininkė"><i>juostinin</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kalpokė"><i>kalpo</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="katerininkė"><i>katerinin</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="keturvietininkė"><i>keturvietinin</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kiškė"><i>kiš</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="konditerininkė"><i>konditerinin</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kreivarankė"><i>kreivaran</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kuršininkė"><i>kuršinin</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lankininkė"><i>lankinin</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="linininkė"><i>lininin</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="malkininkė"><i>malkinin</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="medininkė"><i>medinin</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="meškė"><i>meš</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="muitininkė"><i>muitinin</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="namininkė"><i>naminin</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="niektikė"><i>niekti</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="padienininkė"><i>padieninin</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pamariškė"><i>pamariš</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pasininkė"><i>pasinin</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="paštininkė"><i>paštinin</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="perversmininkė"><i>perversminin</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pirtininkė"><i>pirtinin</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="plėškininkė"><i>plėškinin</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pradininkė"><i>pradinin</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="proanūkė"><i>proanū</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pyragininkė"><i>pyraginin</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="raudonikė"><i>raudoni</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="riestainininkė"><i>riestaininin</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rėžininkė"><i>rėžinin</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="savininkė"><i>savinin</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="serediškė"><i>serediš</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skeptikė"><i>skepti</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sprandininkė"><i>sprandinin</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sąmokslininkė"><i>sąmokslinin</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tikybininkė"><i>tikybinin</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="turkė"><i>tur</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vakarėlininkė"><i>vakarėlinin</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="verslininkė"><i>verslinin</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="virvininkė"><i>virvinin</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="česnakė"><i>česna</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="širdininkė"><i>širdinin</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="žeberklininkė"><i>žeberklinin</i><par n="ka/tė__n"/></e>
